Washington statutes.
RCW 19.16.280

Board created—Composition of board—Qualification of members.

There is hereby created a board to be known and designated as the "Washington state collection agency board." The board shall consist of five members, one of whom shall be the director and the other four shall be appointed by the governor. The director may delegate his or her duties as a board member to a designee from his or her department. The director or his or her designee shall be the executive officer of the board and its chair.

At least two but no more than two members of the board shall be licensees hereunder. Each of the licensee members of the board shall be actively engaged in the collection agency business at the time of his or her appointment and must continue to be so engaged and continue to be licensed under this chapter during the term of his or her appointment or he or she will be deemed to have resigned his or her position: PROVIDED, That no individual may be a licensee member of the board unless he or she has been actively engaged as either an owner or executive employee or a combination of both of a collection agency business in this state for a period of not less than five years immediately prior to his or her appointment.

No board member shall be employed by or have any interest in, directly or indirectly, as owner, partner, officer, director, agent, stockholder, or attorney, any collection agency in which any other board member is employed by or has such an interest.

No member of the board other than the director or his or her designee shall hold any other elective or appointive state or federal office.

[ 2011 c 336 s 523; 1971 ex.s. c 253 s 19.]